Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 3
COUNCIL OF ADVISORS ON
CONSUMER CREDIT

5-6-301. Council of advisors on consumer credit.

There is hereby created the council of advisors on consumer credit consisting of nine members who shall be appointed by the governor. One of the advisors shall be designated by the governor as chairperson. In appointing members of the council, the governor shall seek to achieve a fair representation from the various segments of the consumer credit industry and public.

The term of office of each member of the council is three years. A member chosen to fill a vacancy arising otherwise than by expiration of a term shall be appointed for the unexpired term of the member whom he or she is to succeed. A member of the council is eligible for reappointment.

Members of the council shall serve without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement of actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1254, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-6-301, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-6-302. Function of council - conflict of interest.

The council shall advise and consult with the administrator concerning the exercise of the administrator's powers under this code and may make recommendations to the administrator. Members of the council may assist the administrator in obtaining compliance with this code. Since it is an objective of this part 3 to obtain competent representatives of creditors and the public to serve on the council and to assist and cooperate with the administrator in achieving the objectives of this code, service on the council shall not in itself constitute a conflict of interest regardless of the occupations or associations of the members.

There is hereby created a subcommittee of the council of advisors on consumer credit for the purpose specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2). The subcommittee shall consist of the attorney general, the chairperson of the council, and three members of the council appointed by such chairperson. Of the subcommittee members who are also members of the council, two shall be representatives of the consumer credit industry and two shall be representatives of the public. Any action taken by a majority of the subcommittee shall constitute action by the council.

The subcommittee may review, repeal, amend, or modify any rule promulgated by the administrator pursuant to section 5-6-104 (1)(e).

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1254, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-6-302, as it existed prior to 2000.